Utah statutes.
34-29-1.   License required -- Agencies for teachers excepted.

It shall be unlawful for any person to open and establish in any city or town, or elsewhere within the limits of this state, any intelligence or employment office for the purpose of procuring or obtaining for money or other valuable consideration, either directly or indirectly, any work or employment for persons seeking the same, or to otherwise engage in such business, or in any way to act as a broker or go-between between employers and persons seeking work, without first having obtained a license so to do from the city, town, or, if not within any city or town, from the county where such intelligence or employment office is to be opened or such business is to be carried on.  Any person performing any of these services shall be deemed to be an employment agent within the meaning of this chapter, but the provisions of Section 34-29-10 do not apply to any person operating agencies for schoolteachers; but it shall be a misdemeanor for any schoolteachers' employment agency to receive as commission for information or assistance such as is described herein any consideration in value in excess of 5% of the amount of the first year's salary of the person to whom such information is furnished.



Amended by Chapter 297, 2011 General Session

